Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 22 Food Stamp Employment and Training Program

40-22-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Food Stamp Employment and Training Program.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 387, § 1.

40-22-2.
Legislative findings.

Many food stamp recipients need assistance entering the job market or increasing their skills to obtain a good paying job.

There are federal funds available through the food stamp employment and training to pay for education, training, job placement, case management, and other work-readiness services for food stamp recipients and to pay the administrative costs of managing the program.

There are no general revenue funds required to access the federal food stamp employment and training program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 387, § 1.

40-22-3.
Food stamp employment and training program.

The department of human services is authorized and directed to amend the food stamp employment and training plan submitted to the United States Department of Agriculture to maximize the receipt of federal funds for employment and training for food stamp recipients. The department may, as necessary and appropriate, implement a pilot program with such education, training, and job placement providers as determined by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 387, § 1.